Maryland, session 2025, HB1145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–214.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:
(1) if a license is denied, another license application may not be considered
from the same applicant or for the same location for 6 months after the denial; and
(2) if a subsequent application by the same applicant or for the same
location is denied within a 2–year period immediately after the first denial, another
application may not be considered from that applicant or for that location until the 2–year
period expires.
– 1 –

Ch. 841 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) an applicant, if the license was denied because it was not necessary to
accommodate the public or the location was not suitable for the sale of alcoholic beverages;
or
(2) the location, if the license was denied because the local licensing board
determined that the applicant was not a proper person to be issued the license.
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–1501.
(b) The following sections of Title 4, Subtitle 2 (“Issuance or Denial of Local
Licenses”) of Division I of this article apply in the county:
(1) § 4–202 (“Authority of local licensing boards”), subject to § 13–1502 of
this subtitle;
(2) § 4–203 (“Prohibition against issuing multiple licenses to individual or
for use of entity”), subject to § 13–1503 of this subtitle and Subtitle 13, Part III of this title;
(3) § 4–204 (“Prohibition against issuing multiple licenses for same
premises”), subject to Subtitle 13, Part III and Subtitle 16, Part II of this title;
(4) § 4–208 (“Notice of license application required”), subject to § 13–1504
of this subtitle; and
(5) § 4–214 (“Waiting periods after denial of license applications”), subject
to [§ 13–1505] §§ 13–1505 AND 13–1506 of this subtitle.
13–1506.
(A) IF A LICENSE APPLICATION IS DENIED, ANOTHER LICENSE
APPLICATION FOR THE SAME LOCATION MAY NOT BE MADE FOR 1 YEAR AFTER THE
DENIAL.
(B) IF A LICENSE APPLICATION FOR A LOCATION IS DENIED TWICE, A
LICENSE MAY NOT BE ISSUED FOR THE SAME LOCATION FOR 2 YEARS AFTER THE
SECOND DENIAL.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 841
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –